Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.120

Class voting.

A class of members or shareholders shall be entitled to vote as a class upon any proposition, whether or not entitled to vote thereon by the provisions of the articles of incorporation, if the proposition would increase or decrease the rights, qualifications, limitations, responsibilities or preferences of the class as related to any other class.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 24.]